Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 40

Control of Contagious Diseases

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-12 may not apply to subchapter 13 which was enacted subsequently.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-12 may not apply to §2-40-508 which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1925, No. 224, § 6: effective on passage.

Acts 1929, No. 84, § 6: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 2, 1929.

Acts 1987, No. 413, § 3: Mar. 26, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that when disease breaks out in a poultry flock, it may spread rapidly from that flock to other flocks nearby unless the diseased poultry is destroyed immediately; that in order to avoid the spread of poultry disease, it is urgent that the Livestock and Poultry Commission be granted the authority to acquire diseased flocks of poultry through negotiation or condemnation and to destroy those flocks to prevent further spread of the disease; that this act grants such authority to the Livestock and Poultry Commission and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

2-40-101, 2-40-102. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning penalties and administration, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§ 36, 37. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-40-101. Acts 1907, No. 409, §§ 4, 7, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., §§ 351, 354; Pope's Dig., §§ 376, 379; Acts 1981, No. 823, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-404, 78-407; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 23.

2-40-103. Duties and enforcement.

It is the duty of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to:

Inquire into and investigate all outbreaks of contagious or infectious disease of animals;

Establish and promulgate rules in regard to isolation or quarantine of infected animals, disinfection of animals and premises, destruction of incurably diseased animals, and disposal of carcasses as it may deem necessary to prevent the spread of disease;

Promulgate rules for the protection of areas from which animal diseases may be eradicated; and

Draft rules for compensation for owners of exposed or diseased animals and contaminated equipment or other material unsuitable for proper disinfection or destroyed, or for others for any other necessary expenses or for any other purpose, indemnity being subject to available funds.

Any federal veterinary inspector working in Arkansas cooperating with the commission shall have the power of enforcing the rules of the commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “and investigate” in (a)(1); and deleted former (a)(3) and (a)(6) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Ark. L. Rev.

Legal Control of Business in Arkansas, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 137.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning duty to report, and inspectors and agents, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§ 39, 40. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-40-104. Acts 1907, No. 409, § 6, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., § 353; Pope's Dig., § 378; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-406.

2-40-105. Acts 1907, No. 409, § 8, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., § 355; Pope's Dig., § 380; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-409; Acts 1995, No. 236, § 23.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “and poultry” in (a)(1); deleted “In case of opposition or hindrance” at the beginning of (a)(2); in (b)(1), deleted “of the commission” following “State Veterinarian” and substituted “necropsy” for “autopsy”; redesignated former (b)(2)(A)(i) as (b)(2)(A); substituted “any reportable” for “glanders or other contagious or infectious” in (b)(2)(A); deleted former (b)(2)(A)(ii); and, in (b)(2)(B), substituted “an administrative penalty” for “a misdemeanor” and deleted the former second sentence.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning expenses and anthrax spore vaccine, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§42, 43. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-40-107. Acts 1907, No. 409, § 17, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., § 364; Pope's Dig., § 389; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-411.

2-40-108. Acts 1907, No. 409, § 16, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., § 363; Acts 1925, No. 224, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 388; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-604.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “infected with a reportable disease the flock may be depopulated or condemned” for “diseased and that the flock should be destroyed” and deleted “the commission may negotiate for and buy that flock at a price that would reasonably approximate the market value of that flock if it were not diseased and may dispose of the diseased poultry in such manner as it deems appropriate to prevent the spread of the disease” from the end; deleted former (b); redesignated former (c) as (b); and deleted “if the procedures for condemnation shall provide the owner an opportunity to be heard in the matter, shall assure him or her fair compensation for the birds, and shall otherwise afford the owner full due process of law in the condemnation process” from the end of (b).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “euthanized” for “destroyed” in (a)(1)(B); added (a)(1)(C); added (a)(3); and substituted “A person who violates this section is subject to an administrative penalty” for “A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor” in (b).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Agricultural Law, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 347.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§2-40-201 —2-40-209 may not apply to §2-40-210 which was enacted subsequently.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter may affect §2-40-501 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, Nos. 150 and 151, § 10: Feb. 19, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Livestock and Poultry Commission is without legislative authority to properly carry out its charge to control, supress and eradicate livestock and poultry diseases and pests and supervise livestock and poultry sanitary work in this state; that this act is designed to clarify and expand the authority of the commission in the area of disease and should be given effect immediately in order that epidemics of disease in livestock and poultry may be avoided. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 32: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning provisions supplemental, authority of commission generally, power of subpoena, and testing and vaccination of livestock, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§ 46-49. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-40-201. Acts 1985, No. 150, § 8; 1985, No. 151, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-479n.

2-40-202. Acts 1985, No. 150, § 1; 1985, No. 151, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-475.

2-40-203. Acts 1985, No. 150, § 1; 1985, No. 151, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-475.

2-40-204. Acts 1985, No. 150, § 1; 1985, No. 151, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-475.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “state law or rule or federal law, rule, or regulation” for “state or federal law or regulation” in (b).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 342, § 1 is amended by Acts 2015, No. 1077, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 342, in present (a)(1)(A), substituted “bovine disease” for “brucellosis” following “partially fund the” and substituted “bovine disease control and eradication” for “brucellosis” near the end.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1077 inserted designation (a)(1)(A); in (a)(1)(A), substituted “is levied” for “is hereby levied until July 1, 1990” and “to be used for” for “after which the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall establish the amount of the fee it feels necessary to continue”; and added (a)(1)(B).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1)(B)(i), substituted “Deputy Director” for “Executive Director” and the second occurrence of “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” for “executive director”; substituted “commission” for “executive director” in (a)(1)(B)(iv); and added (b)(2)(C).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in the first sentence of (b)(1) and for “director” throughout (b); and substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (b)(2)(C).

History.

Acts 1907, No. 409, §§ 2, 9, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., §§ 349, 356; Acts 1925, No. 224, § 1; 1929, No. 84, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 372, 381; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-402, 78-410; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 38.

2-40-104, 2-40-105. [Repealed.]

2-40-106. Examinations and findings.

(1)Any veterinary inspector or other employee duly authorized by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall have the privilege of entering upon any property or premises in this state for the purpose of examining or testing animals which he or she has reason to believe are affected with a contagious or infectious disease so as to constitute a menace to the livestock and poultry of the community.

He or she may call on one (1) or more peace officers. It shall be their duty to give him or her all assistance in their power.

(1)When ordered by the State Veterinarian, owners or persons in charge of animals shall assemble them at a designated time and place for the purpose of examining, testing, treating, necropsy, disinfecting, or for any other purpose.

(A)If after examination of suspected animals the veterinary inspector shall find them to be affected with any reportable disease, he or she shall furnish the owner or person in charge of the animals with a report of his or her findings and with a copy of the existing law and rules of the commission in regard to the disease.

Any person who, after notification, shall fail to comply with the rules shall be guilty of an administrative penalty. He or she shall also be liable for damages to others due to infection from his or her stock.

History.

Acts 1907, No. 409, §§ 3, 5, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., §§ 350, 352; Acts 1929, No. 84, § 3; Pope's Dig., §§ 374, 377; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-403, 78-405; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 41.

2-40-107, 2-40-108. [Repealed.]

When the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission determines that any flock of chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, or other poultry is infected with a reportable disease, the flock may be depopulated or condemned and properly disposed of to prevent the spread of the disease.

The commission is authorized to adopt rules to prescribe the procedures for condemning a diseased poultry flock as authorized in this section.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 413, § 1; 2017, No. 1011, § 44.

2-40-110. Canine brucellosis.

(1)If a dog tests positive for canine brucellosis, the owner shall:

Report the test results to the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

Immediately have the dog neutered, spayed, or euthanized; and

Immediately test all other sexually intact dogs on the premises for canine brucellosis.

If the owner is unknown, then the person having custody of the dog shall comply with this section.

The sale or adoption of sexually intact dogs from a positive premises is prohibited.

A person who violates this section is subject to an administrative penalty.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1771, § 1; 2017, No. 1011, § 45.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission Programs

2-40-201 — 2-40-204. [Repealed.]

No person shall perform any program or certifying blood tests on livestock or poultry unless the person has first completed a blood test training program designed and conducted by the State Veterinarian and has obtained a tester's permit from the State Veterinarian.

These technicians shall be used at the market, where economically feasible, except when in violation of state law or rule or federal law, rule, or regulation.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 150, § 3; 1985, No. 151, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-477; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 28.

2-40-206. Funding of bovine disease program.

(1)(A)In order to fund or partially fund the bovine disease control and eradication program, there is levied a fee of one dollar ($1.00) per head on all cattle sold in this state to be used for the bovine disease control and eradication program.

(i)However, if the Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission determines there is an emergency, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may promulgate a rule to temporarily raise the fee set in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section after receiving approval of the rule from the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

A rule adopted to raise the fee under this subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be effective only during the period of time the emergency persists or for one (1) year, whichever is shorter.

If an emergency persists after one (1) year, the commission may promulgate a rule to extend the increased fee for additional one-year periods by following the procedures stated in subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section each year the rule increasing the fee is to be effective.

The commission shall not adopt an emergency rule to raise the fee under this subdivision (a)(1)(B).

The fee shall not be assessed on the resale of any cattle within ten (10) calendar days after the prior sale if the fee was paid on the prior sale.

(1)The fee shall be collected by the purchaser and remitted monthly to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, except that if the sale occurs through a livestock auction market or any other agent of the seller, the livestock auction market or other agent shall collect and remit the fee. The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may promulgate such rules as he or she deems necessary to implement the collection of the fee.

(A)After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund the remainder of funds so remitted to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund.

Before the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the amount of funds which will remain at the end of the fiscal year in the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund from fees collected under the provisions of this section. He or she shall allow such funds to be carried forward and made available for the same purposes in the next-succeeding fiscal year.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall release all information related to the fee levied per head on all cattle sold in the state to be used for the bovine disease control and eradication fund when requested by the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 150, § 1; 1985, No. 151, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-475; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 26; 2015, No. 342, § 1; 2015, No. 1077, § 1; 2017, No. 1011, § 50; 2019, No. 910, § 3297.

2-40-207. Costs of on-the-farm calfhood vaccinations.

The costs of on-the-farm calfhood vaccination performed by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall be paid from state or federal funds. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a livestock owner from contracting with and compensating a veterinarian for vaccinating his or her livestock. Veterinarians shall not charge both the livestock owner and the state or federal government for the same calfhood vaccination.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 150, § 7; 1985, No. 151, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-479; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 192, § 27.

2-40-208. Inspection of livestock markets.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall prescribe minimum sanitary and health standards for livestock markets in the state to promote and protect the health of livestock handled at these markets and the health of personnel working in the markets.

The commission or its agents shall periodically inspect the markets for compliance with the sanitary and health standards.

If the commission or its agents find that any market is not in compliance with such standards, it shall notify the operator of the market, in writing, of areas in which the market is out of compliance.

The market operator shall, within fifteen (15) days after receipt of the notice, certify to the commission the steps it has taken to comply with the standards.

If the operator fails to respond or if the commission or its agents determine that the market has not complied with the health and sanitation standards, the market shall be inspected by a committee consisting of:

One (1) livestock market representative;

Two (2) livestock producers; and

The State Veterinarian.

Members of the committee shall be appointed by the chair of the commission, and these members shall be from outside the livestock market's trade area.

If the committee finds that the market does not meet the prescribed sanitary standards, the commission shall order the market closed immediately until the market is found to be in compliance with the health and sanitation standards.

Members of the commission may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “shall” for “is authorized and directed to” in (a)(1).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b), deleted “and regulations” following “rules” and substituted “shall be subject to an administrative penalty” for “pursuant to its statutory authority shall, upon conviction be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor”.

One (1) extension of thirty (30) days, if presented in writing to the commission, will be considered in extenuating circumstances.

The commission shall adopt appropriate rules concerning depopulation, negotiation, and hearing procedures.

(1)The State Veterinarian or his or her designated representative will negotiate with the owner through the use of available federal and state funds to depopulate brucellosis-infected or exposed bovine herds.

Following the hearing, the commission shall determine whether to affirm or repeal its order to depopulate.

Any person or entity who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to an administrative penalty.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§2-40-201 —2-40-209 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “be subject to an administrative penalty” for “upon conviction be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor” in (d).

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning dead animals generally, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 53. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-301. Acts 1917, No. 173, § 3, p. 947; C. & M. Dig., § 367; Acts 1925, No. 224, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 392; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-417; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 24.

2-40-302. Acts 1917, No. 173, §§ 1-3, p. 947; C. & M. Dig., §§ 365-367; Acts 1925, No. 224, § 3; Pope's Dig., §§ 390-392; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-415 — 78-417.

2-40-303. Acts 1917, No. 173, § 4, p. 947; C. & M. Dig., § 368; Acts 1925, No. 224, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 393; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-418.

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 168, § 6: Oct. 1, 1985.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 20, § 6: Nov. 6, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Livestock and Poultry Commission should have authority to regulate the methods and procedures for the disposal of fowl carcasses; that this Act will grant such authority to the Commission; and that this Act should go into effect immediately in order to provide needed flexibility to the law as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, Nos. 241 and 250, § 7: Feb. 26, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that eliminating the use of disposal pits is essential for effectively and efficiently protecting the health and well being of the public. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Ark. L. Rev.

Noble and Looney, The Emerging Legal Framework for Animal Agricultural Waste Management in Arkansas, 47 Ark. L. Rev. 159.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 150, § 2; 1985, No. 151, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-476; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 9; 2007, No. 827, § 7.

2-40-209. Quarantine — Violations.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission is authorized to adopt appropriate rules regarding the isolation or quarantine of infected, exposed, or suspected infected livestock or poultry.

Any person or entity who violates the quarantine rules lawfully promulgated by the commission shall be subject to an administrative penalty.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 150, § 4; 1985, No. 151, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-478; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 51.

2-40-210. Control and eradication of brucellosis.

(1)Any bovine herd infected with or directly exposed to brucellosis shall be depopulated at the discretion of and subject to the rules of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

The herd or herds shall be identified and destroyed within thirty (30) days of written order to the owner or owners.

(A)The owners will be notified by delivery of the order or by certified mail.

If the State Veterinarian and the herd owner are unable to arrive at an agreement to depopulate infected or exposed bovine herds, the commission, on advice of the State Veterinarian and in public meeting, is authorized to issue a written order to depopulate a herd and to provide indemnification to the herd owner at the current established per-head rate, with such indemnification to be paid from federal and state funds available therefor.

(A)Should the herd owner desire, the commission will hear testimony by the owner and any witnesses he or she desires to present arguments as to why the herd or herds should not be depopulated.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 128, §§ 1-5; 1995 No. 140, §§ 1-5; 2017, No. 1011, § 52.

Subchapter 3

— Dead Animals Generally

2-40-301 — 2-40-303. [Repealed.]

2-40-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Approved incineration” means a method of incineration approved by the commission;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission created by § 2-33-101;

“Fowl” shall include all domesticated avian species;

“Fowl carcasses” means carcasses of fowl which died as the result of sickness, suffocation, accident, or from any cause other than intentional slaughter; and

“Responsible person” means the person who has the direct responsibility for the day-to-day care of the fowl involved.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 168, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-415.1; Acts 1993, No. 241, § 1; 1993, No. 250, § 1.

2-40-402. Penalty.

A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to an administrative penalty.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 168, § 5; A.S.A. 1977, § 78-415.5; Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 54.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

2-40-403. Requirements.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall, by rule, specify acceptable methods for the disposal of fowl carcasses, including, but not limited to:

Composting of carcasses;

Cremation or incineration;

Extrusion;

On-farm freezing;

Rendering; and

Cooking for swine feed.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in the introductory language of the section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 168, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-415.2; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 20, § 1; 1993, No. 241, § 2; 1993, No. 250, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 29.

2-40-404. Specifications.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall, by rule, specify acceptable methods of the disposal of fowl carcasses in the event of a major die-off.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 168, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-415.3; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 20, § 2; 1993, No. 241, § 3; 1993, No. 250, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 30.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

2-40-405. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning regulations, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 55. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 168, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-415.4.

2-40-406. Division of Environmental Quality — Jurisdiction unimpaired.

This subchapter shall not be interpreted as denying or preempting the regulatory or enforcement jurisdiction of the Division of Environmental Quality.

History.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 20, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2415.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the section heading and the section.

Subchapter 5

— Brucellosis Vaccination

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§2-40-501 —2-40-507 may not apply to §2-40-508 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 1993, No. 1174, § 27: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

2-40-501 — 2-40-507. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning penalty, vaccination required, standards for vaccine, refusal to vaccinate, enforcement, cooperative agreements, and indemnities, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§ 56-62. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-40-501. Acts 1981, No. 271, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-470.

2-40-503. Acts 1981, No. 271, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-467.

2-40-505. Acts 1981, No. 271, §§ 5, 8, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-465, 78-468, 78-469.

2-40-507. Acts 1981, No. 770, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-461.1.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission will continue to vaccinate heifers on the farm and at the sale barns for brucellosis and will carry out all the practices of the commission which have brought the state to its current near brucellosis-free status.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1174, § 19; 2017, No. 1011, § 63.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-12 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

References to “this subchapter” in §§2-40-501 —2-40-507 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted “employees of the” preceding “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission”.

Subchapter 6

— Brucellosis Control Areas

2-40-601 — 2-40-603. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning brucellosis control areas, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 64. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-601. Acts 1957, No. 33, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-433.

2-40-603. Acts 1957, No. 33, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-435.

2-40-701 — 2-40-708. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning hog cholera virus, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 65. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-701. Acts 1957, No. 154, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-605.

2-40-703. Acts 1963, No. 248, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-447.

2-40-705. Acts 1963, No. 248, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-442.

2-40-707. Acts 1963, No. 248, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-444.

Subchapter 8

— Equine Infectious Anemia

Publisher's Notes. An earlier version of former subchapter 8, concerning equine infectious anemia, was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1007. However, the former subchapter, as reenacted, is deemed to be superseded by this subchapter. The former subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-801. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1212, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-455; Acts 1987, No. 1007, § 1.

2-40-803. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1212, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-456; Acts 1987, No. 1007, § 2.

2-40-805. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1212, §§ 3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-457, 78-459; Acts 1987, No. 1007, §§ 3, 5.

Former subchapter 8, concerning equine infectious anemia, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1306, § 31. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

2-40-801. Acts 1987, No. 374, § 1.

2-40-803. Acts 1987, No. 374, § 2; 1987, No. 1034, § 1; 1991, No. 1155, § 2.

2-40-805. Acts 1991, No. 1155, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 10, § 7: Feb. 2, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that horse racing and activities related thereto in Arkansas have a significant favorable impact on the economy of the entire state and the welfare of our citizens and residents, and it is imperative that the provisions of this act be effective to the fullest extent possible with respect to the upcoming racing season scheduled to begin January 29, 1999 in order to maintain and improve Arkansas' premier and traditional position in horse racing, and in order to accomplish these goals (essential to the welfare of the state and its citizens and residents) the amendments and provisions set forth in this act must be effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect, and be in full force, immediately from and after its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”